Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 5.
Virginia Model Interstate Parole
and Probation Hearings Act.

§ 53.1-168. Procedure when reincarceration of out-of-state parolee or probationer should be considered.

When supervision of a parolee or probationer is being administered by this Commonwealth pursuant to Article 4 (§

53.1-166

et seq.) of this chapter and such parolee or probationer is arrested pursuant to the provisions of § 53.1-162 or upon a warrant issued by the state where he was paroled or placed on probation and charged with violation of the terms or conditions of parole or probation, a preliminary hearing at or near the site of the alleged violation may be held in accordance with this article. The purpose of such hearing shall be to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the parolee or probationer has committed a violation of a condition of parole or probation.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.1; 1975, c. 39; 1977, c. 106; 1978, c. 341; 1982, c. 636.)

Cross references.

- For similar act, see Burns Ind. Code Ann.

§

11-13-5-1 et seq.

§ 53.1-169. Who may hold hearings; procedures therefor.

Any hearing held pursuant to this article may be before the person or persons designated by the compact administrator of this Commonwealth or his designee to hold preliminary hearings involving alleged parole or probation violations. No hearing officer, however, shall be the person or the direct supervisor of the person making the allegation of violation.

The compact administrator of this Commonwealth or his designee shall establish a procedure for the administrative hearings held pursuant to this article.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.2; 1975, c. 39; 1977, c. 106; 1982, c. 636.)

§ 53.1-170. Rights of parolee or probationer at hearing.

With respect to any hearing held pursuant to this article, the parolee or probationer:

Shall have reasonable notice in writing of the nature and content of the allegations made, including notice that its purpose is to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that he has committed a violation of a condition of parole or probation;

Shall be permitted to consult with any persons whose assistance he reasonably desires, prior to the hearing;

Shall have the right to confront and examine any person who has made allegations or given evidence against him, unless the hearing officer determines that such confrontation would present a substantial present or subsequent danger of harm to such person;

May admit, deny or explain the violation alleged and may present proof, including affidavits and other evidence, in support of his contentions.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.3; 1975, c. 39; 1982, c. 636.)

§ 53.1-171. Record of hearing.

A record of the hearing held pursuant to this article shall be made and preserved.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.4; 1975, c. 39; 1982, c. 636.)

§ 53.1-172. Hearings for parolees, probationers or felons serving a period of postrelease supervision being supervised in another state.

In any case of alleged parole, postrelease period of supervision, or probation violation by a person being supervised in another state pursuant to the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders, any appropriate judicial or administrative authority in another state, upon request by the compact administrator of this Commonwealth or his designee, is authorized to hold a hearing on the alleged violation, which hearing shall be substantially similar to the hearing required by this article. Upon receipt of the record of a parole, postrelease period of supervision, or probation violation hearing held in another state pursuant to a statute substantially similar to this article, such record shall be conclusive and shall not be reviewable within or by this Commonwealth.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.5; 1975, c. 39; 1977, c. 106; 1982, c. 636; 2000, c. 767; 2004, c. 407.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2004, c. 407, cl. 3, provides: "That the provisions of this act shall become effective on the later of July 1, 2004, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders, in substantially the form set out in

§

53.1-176.2

of this act, by no less than 35 states, as provided in

§

53.1-176.2

. In making a determination that this act has come into effect, the Governor may rely on the written representation of the National Institute of Corrections of the United States Department of Justice." As of July 1, 2004, the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders had been enacted by 35 states.

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 767, in the catchline, inserted "or felons serving a period of post release supervision" and inserted "postrelease period of supervision" in the first and last sentences.

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendment by c. 407 substituted "the Supervision of Adult Offenders" for "Out-of-State Supervision of Parolees or Probationers" in the first sentence. For effective date, see Editor's note.

§ 53.1-173. Preliminary hearings for out-of-state parolees in Virginia.

In any case in which any person released on parole from another state is present in Virginia, if such person is not present in Virginia pursuant to the provisions of Article 4 (§

53.1-166

et seq.), upon request by the duly constituted judicial or administrative authorities of such other state, the compact administrator of Virginia or his designee shall cause to be conducted a preliminary hearing to determine probable cause for violation of conditions of parole. Such preliminary hearing shall be substantially similar to the hearing provided for in §§

53.1-168

through

53.1-172

.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.7; 1975, c. 39; 1977, c. 106; 1982, c. 636.)

§ 53.1-174. Preliminary hearings by other states.

In any case in which any person placed on parole or postrelease period of supervision by Virginia is present in another state, if such person is not present in such other state pursuant to the provisions of Article 6 (§

53.1-176.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title, upon request by the compact administrator of Virginia or his designee, the appropriate judicial or administrative authorities of such other state in which such person is present, having jurisdiction to conduct preliminary hearings to determine probable cause for violation of conditions of parole or postrelease period of supervision, shall cause to be conducted a preliminary hearing to determine probable cause for violation of conditions of parole. Such preliminary hearing shall be substantially similar to the hearing provided for in §§

53.1-168

through

53.1-172

. A decision thereon shall be conclusive and shall not be reviewable within or by Virginia.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.8; 1975, c. 39; 1977, c. 106; 1982, c. 636; 2000, c. 767; 2004, c. 407.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2004, c. 407, cl. 3, provides: "That the provisions of this act shall become effective on the later of July 1, 2004, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders, in substantially the form set out in

§

53.1-176.2

of this act, by no less than 35 states, as provided in

§

53.1-176.2

. In making a determination that this act has come into effect, the Governor may rely on the written representation of the National Institute of Corrections of the United States Department of Justice." As of July 1, 2004, the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders had been enacted by 35 states.

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 767 inserted "postrelease period of supervision" twice in the first sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendment by c. 407 substituted "Article 6 (

§

53.1-176.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title" for "Article 4 (

§

53.1-166

et seq.)" in the first sentence. For effective date, see Editor's note.

§ 53.1-175. Revocation of parole by Virginia.

If probable cause be found that a parolee present in Virginia has violated one or more of the terms and conditions of parole, upon request from the appropriate judicial or administrative authorities of the state from which he was paroled, the Virginia Parole Board is hereby authorized to determine whether there has been a violation of the terms and conditions of parole, and if so, whether such parole should be revoked. The decision thereon of Virginia shall be conclusive and shall not be reviewable within or by such other state.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.9; 1975, c. 39; 1977, c. 106; 1982, c. 636.)

§ 53.1-176. Revocation of parole by other states.

If probable cause be found that a parolee from Virginia has violated one or more of the terms and conditions of his parole, upon request by the Virginia Parole Board, the appropriate judicial or administrative authority of another state in which a parolee is present having the authority to revoke a parole is hereby authorized to determine whether there has been a violation of the terms and conditions of parole and, if so, whether such parole should be revoked. The decision thereon of such authorities of such other state shall be conclusive and shall not be reviewable within or by Virginia.

(Code 1950, § 53-290.10; 1975, c. 39; 1977, c. 106; 1982, c. 636.)